Indiana, session 2026, HB1313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-5-48 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 48. (a) As used in this section, "lobbyist" has the
meaning set forth in IC 2-7-1-10.
(b) As used in this section, "public school" does not include a
charter school.
(c) A school corporation, public school, or governing body of a
school corporation may not spend public funds to:
(1) hire or contract with, for the purpose of lobbying a
member of the general assembly, a person required to register
as a lobbyist under IC 2-7-2; or
(2) pay a nonprofit association or organization that:
(A) primarily represents school corporations, public
schools, or governing bodies; and
(B) hires or contracts with a person required to register as
a lobbyist under IC 2-7-2.
(d) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


following:
(1) An employee of a school corporation or public school or a
member of a governing body from providing information for
a member of the general assembly or appearing before a
committee of the general assembly.
(2) An employee or member described in subdivision (1) from
advocating for or against or otherwise influencing or
attempting to influence the outcome of legislation pending
before the general assembly if the actions would not require
a person to register as a lobbyist under IC 2-7-2.
(3) A school corporation or public school from reimbursing a
full-time employee or member of the governing body for
direct travel expenses incurred by the employee or member
for engaging in an activity described in subdivision (1) or (2).
(4) A full-time employee of a nonprofit association or
organization that primarily represents school corporations,
public schools, or governing bodies from:
(A) providing legislative services related to bill tracking,
bill analysis, and legislative alerts;
(B) communicating directly with a member of the general
assembly to provide information if the communication
would not require a person to register as a lobbyist under
IC 2-7-2; or
(C) testifying for or against legislation before the general
assembly.
(e) If a school corporation, public school, or governing body of
a school corporation violates this section, a taxpayer or resident of
Indiana may bring a civil action against the school corporation,
public school, or governing body.
(f) The court may award to a taxpayer or resident of Indiana
who prevails in an action under subsection (e) the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 2. IC 20-28-9-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) Upon a teacher's written request, a
governing body shall withhold the requested amount of money from the
salary of the teacher for a purpose described in subsection (c).
(b) Upon a written request from a beneficiary of the Indiana state
teachers' retirement fund, a governing body may receive a given
amount of money for a purpose described in subsection (c).
(c) Except as provided under IC 20-29-5-6.5, the governing body
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


shall hold the amounts described in subsections (a) and (b) and pay the
amounts, as requested by the teacher or the beneficiary, to an insurance
company or other agency or organization in Indiana that provides,
extends, supervises, or pays for:
(1) insurance or other protection; or
(2) the establishment of or payment on an annuity account;
for the teacher. If a dividend accrues on a policy, the dividend shall be
paid or credited to the teacher.
(d) Except as provided under IC 20-29-5-6.5, if less than twenty
percent (20%) of the teachers employed by a governing body request
payment of the amounts described in subsection (c) to a single
recipient, withholding the amounts of money for insurance, dues, or
other purposes is discretionary with the governing body.
SECTION 3. IC 20-29-5-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the school employer shall,
on receipt of the written authorization of a school employee:
(1) deduct from the pay of the employee any dues designated or
certified by the appropriate officer of a school employee
organization that is an exclusive representative of any employees
of the school employer; and
(2) remit the dues described in subdivision (1) to the school
employee organization.
(b) Deductions under this section must be consistent with:
(1) IC 22-2-6;
(2) IC 22-2-7; and
(3) IC 20-28-9-18.
(c) The following apply to a deduction authorization by a school
employee under subsection (a) or when a school employer agrees with
a school employee organization to deduct school organization dues
from a school employee's pay:
(1) A school employee has the right to resign from, and end any
financial obligation to, a school employee organization at any
time. The right described in this subdivision may not be waived
by the school employee.
(2) The authorization for withholding form shall include the
school employee's full name, position, school employee
organization, and signature and shall be submitted directly to the
school employer by the school employee. After receiving the
authorization for withholding form, the school employer shall
confirm the authorization by sending an electronic mail message
to the school employee at the school employee's school provided
work electronic mail address and shall wait for confirmation of
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


the authorization before starting any deduction. If the school
employee does not possess a school provided work electronic mail
address, the school employer may use other means it deems
appropriate to confirm the authorization.
(3) An authorization for school employee organization dues to be
deducted from school employee pay shall be on a form prescribed
by the attorney general, in consultation with the board, and shall
contain a statement in 14 point type boldface font reading: "The
State of Indiana wishes to make you aware that you have a First
Amendment right, as recognized by the United States Supreme
Court, to refrain from joining and paying dues to a union (school
employee organization). Your membership and payment of dues
are voluntary, and you may not be discriminated against for your
refusal to join or financially support a union. By signing this form,
you are agreeing to authorize your employer to deduct union dues
from your salary in the amounts specified in accordance with your
union's bylaws. You may revoke this authorization at any time.".
(4) Authorizations by a school employee for the withholding of
school employee organization dues from the school employee's
pay shall not exceed one (1) year in duration and shall be subject
to annual renewal.
(5) Upon the submission of a written or electronic mail request to
a school employer, a school employee shall have the right to cease
the withholding of school employee organization dues from their
pay. Upon receipt of a request, the school employer shall:
(A) cease the withholding of school employee organization
dues from the school employee's pay beginning on the first day
of the employee's next pay period; and
(B) provide written or electronic mail notification of the school
employee's decision to the school employee organization.
The notification in clause (B) must occur within a reasonable time
to ensure that the school employee is not required to have dues
withheld during the school employee's next pay period or any
subsequent pay period.
(6) A school employer shall annually provide, at a time the school
employer prescribes, written or electronic mail notification to its
school employees of their right to cease payment of school
employee organization dues and to withdraw from that
organization. The notification must also include the following:
(A) The authorization form described in subsection (c)(3).
(B) The amount of dues that the school employee will be liable
to pay to the school organization during the duration of the
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


authorization, if the employee does not revoke the
authorization before it expires.
(d) On or before July 1, 2021, and not later than July 30 of each year
thereafter, the attorney general, in consultation with the board and the
department, must notify all school employers of the provisions
described in subsection (c). This notice must include the authorization
form described in subsection (c)(3).
(e) Subsection (c)(3) does not apply to a collective bargaining
agreement or any other contract entered into or renewed before July 1,
2022. However, subsection (c)(3) applies to any collective bargaining
agreement or contract entered into, renewed, modified, extended, or
amended after June 30, 2022.
SECTION 4. IC 20-29-5-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) A school employer may not deduct any dues,
fees, assessment, or other sum of money from the wages or other
earnings of an employee to hold for or pay to a school employee
organization.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to impair a
collective bargaining agreement or any other contract entered into
or renewed before July 1, 2026. However, this section applies to
any collective bargaining agreement or contract entered into,
renewed, modified, extended, or amended after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. IC 20-29-9-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. If an exclusive representative:
(1) engages in; or
(2) aids or abets in;
a strike, the exclusive representative shall lose the exclusive
representative's dues deduction privilege for one (1) year.
SECTION 6. IC 20-30-2-2.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.139-2022,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.7. (a) This section applies to the following:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (b), a public school
maintained by a school corporation.
(2) A charter school that is not a virtual charter school (as defined
in IC 20-24-1-10).
(b) This section does not apply to a dedicated virtual education
school.
(c) As used in this section, "virtual student instructional day" means
a student instructional day to which the following apply:
(1) A school provides virtual instruction or remote learning to at
least fifty percent (50%) of the students enrolled to attend
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


in-person instruction at the school.
(2) A school counts the student instructional day toward meeting
the one hundred eighty (180) day requirement established by
section 3 of this chapter.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (g), (h), a school shall
deliver:
(1) teacher directed synchronous instruction; or
(2) a hybrid of:
(A) teacher directed synchronous instruction for at least fifty
percent (50%) of the particular instructional day; and
(B) asynchronous learning;
during the instructional time of a virtual student instructional day.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (g), (h), a school may conduct
not more than three (3) virtual student instructional days each school
year that do not meet the requirements under subsection (d).
(f) Except as provided in subsection (g), (h), if a school conducts a
student instructional day described in subsection (c)(1) that does not
meet the requirements of this section, the school may not count the
student instructional day toward meeting the one hundred eighty (180)
day requirement established by section 3 of this chapter.
(g) A school corporation may not convert a scheduled
instructional day to virtual instruction under this section because
of the planned or coordinated absence of teachers or other
personnel for the purpose of participating in a protest,
demonstration, or political advocacy event.
(g) (h) A school may submit to the department a request to waive
the requirements set forth in this section to include a virtual student
instructional day otherwise excluded under subsection (f) to meet the
one hundred eighty (180) day requirement established by section 3 of
this chapter if the virtual student instructional day was conducted
because of extraordinary circumstances. The department may waive the
requirements for the school after consideration of the request.
(h) (i) The state board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section. However, the state board shall, in consultation
with the department, adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 that define teacher
directed synchronous instruction and asynchronous learning and
provide that the instruction or learning must be of the same quality and
rigor as required under section 2.5(b) of this chapter.
SECTION 7. IC 20-30-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2022(ts),
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Subject to subsection (c), if a school
corporation fails to conduct the minimum number of student
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


instructional days during a school year as required under section 3 of
this chapter, the department shall reduce the August tuition support
distribution to that school corporation for a school year by an amount
determined as follows:
STEP ONE: Determine the remainder of:
(A) the amount of the total tuition support allocated to the
school corporation for the particular school year; minus
(B) that part of the total tuition support allocated to the school
corporation for that school year with respect to student
instructional days one hundred seventy-six (176) through one
hundred eighty (180).
STEP TWO: Subtract the number of student instructional days
that the school corporation conducted from one hundred eighty
(180).
STEP THREE: Determine the lesser of five (5) or the remainder
determined under STEP TWO.
STEP FOUR: Divide the amount subtracted under STEP ONE (B)
by five (5).
STEP FIVE: Multiply the quotient determined under STEP FOUR
by the number determined under STEP THREE.
STEP SIX: Subtract the number determined under STEP THREE
from the remainder determined under STEP TWO.
STEP SEVEN: Divide the remainder determined under STEP
ONE by one hundred seventy-five (175).
STEP EIGHT: Multiply the quotient determined under STEP
SEVEN by the remainder determined under STEP SIX.
STEP NINE: Add the product determined under STEP FIVE to
the product determined under STEP EIGHT.
(b) If the total amount of state tuition support that a school
corporation receives or will receive during a school year decreases
under this section by an amount that is equal to or more than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from the amount the school
corporation would otherwise be eligible to receive during the school
year as determined under IC 20-43, the budget committee shall review
the amount of and the reason for the decrease before implementation
of the decrease.
(c) If fewer than all of the schools in a school corporation fail to
conduct the minimum number of student instructional days during a
school year as required under section 3 of this chapter, the reduction in
August tuition support required by this section shall take into account
only the schools in the school corporation that failed to conduct the
minimum number of student instructional days and only the grades for
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


which the required number of student instructional days was not
conducted.
(d) A school corporation that violates section 2.7(g) of this
chapter is subject to a reduction in state tuition support under
subsection (a) for each day of violation.
SECTION 8. IC 21-39-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Use of Public Funds for Lobbying the General
Assembly Prohibited
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "lobbyist" has the meaning set
forth in IC 2-7-1-10.
Sec. 2. A state educational institution or board of trustees may
not spend public funds to:
(1) hire or contract with, for the purpose of lobbying a
member of the general assembly, a person required to register
as a lobbyist under IC 2-7-2; or
(2) pay a nonprofit association or organization that:
(A) primarily represents state educational institutions or
boards of trustees; and
(B) hires or contracts with a person required to register as
a lobbyist under IC 2-7-2.
Sec. 3. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the
following:
(1) An employee of a state educational institution or a
member of a board of trustees from providing information for
a member of the general assembly or appearing before a
committee of the general assembly.
(2) An employee or member described in subdivision (1) from
advocating for or against or otherwise influencing or
attempting to influence the outcome of legislation pending
before the general assembly if the actions would not require
a person to register as a lobbyist under IC 2-7-2.
(3) A state educational institution from reimbursing a
full-time employee or a member of the board of trustees for
direct travel expenses incurred by the employee or member
for engaging in an activity described in subdivision (1) or (2).
(4) A full-time employee of a nonprofit association or
organization that primarily represents state educational
institutions or boards of trustees from:
(A) providing legislative services related to bill tracking,
bill analysis, and legislative alerts;
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


(B) communicating directly with a member of the general
assembly to provide information if the communication
would not require a person to register as a lobbyist under
IC 2-7-2; or
(C) testifying for or against legislation before the general
assembly.
Sec. 4. (a) If a state educational institution or board of trustees
violates this chapter, a taxpayer or resident of Indiana may bring
a civil action against the state educational institution or board of
trustees.
(b) The court may award to a taxpayer or resident of Indiana
who prevails in an action under subsection (a) the following:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 9. IC 22-2-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.147-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Any assignment of the wages of an
employee is valid only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The assignment is:
(A) in writing;
(B) signed by the employee personally;
(C) by its terms revocable at any time by the employee upon
written notice to the employer; and
(D) agreed to in writing by the employer.
(2) An executed copy of the assignment is delivered to the
employer within ten (10) days after its execution.
(3) The assignment is made for a purpose described in subsection
(b).
(b) A wage assignment under this section may be made for the
purpose of paying any of the following:
(1) Premium on a policy of insurance obtained for the employee
by the employer.
(2) Pledge or contribution of the employee to a charitable or
nonprofit organization.
(3) Purchase price of bonds or securities, issued or guaranteed by
the United States.
(4) Purchase price of shares of stock, or fractional interests in
shares of stock, of the employing company, or of a company
owning the majority of the issued and outstanding stock of the
employing company, whether purchased from such company, in
the open market or otherwise. However, if such shares are to be
purchased on installments pursuant to a written purchase
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


agreement, the employee has the right under the purchase
agreement at any time before completing purchase of such shares
to cancel said agreement and to have repaid promptly the amount
of all installment payments which theretofore have been made.
(5) Except as provided under IC 20-29-5-6.5, dues to become
owing by the employee to a labor organization of which the
employee is a member.
(6) Purchase price of merchandise, goods, or food offered by the
employer and sold to the employee, for the employee's benefit,
use, or consumption, at the written request of the employee.
(7) Amount of a loan made to the employee by the employer and
evidenced by a written instrument executed by the employee
subject to the amount limits set forth in section 4(c) of this
chapter.
(8) Contributions, assessments, or dues of the employee to a
hospital service or a surgical or medical expense plan or to an
employees' association, trust, or plan existing for the purpose of
paying pensions or other benefits to said employee or to others
designated by the employee.
(9) Payment to any credit union, nonprofit organizations, or
associations of employees of such employer organized under any
law of this state or of the United States.
(10) Payment to any person or organization regulated under the
Uniform Consumer Credit Code (IC 24-4.5) for deposit or credit
to the employee's account by electronic transfer or as otherwise
designated by the employee.
(11) Premiums on policies of insurance and annuities purchased
by the employee on the employee's life.
(12) The purchase price of shares or fractional interest in shares
in one (1) or more mutual funds.
(13) A judgment owed by the employee if the payment:
(A) is made in accordance with an agreement between the
employee and the creditor; and
(B) is not a garnishment under IC 34-25-3.
(14) The purchase, rental, or use of uniforms, shirts, pants, or
other job-related job related clothing at an amount not to exceed
the direct cost paid by an employer to an external vendor for those
items.
(15) The purchase of equipment or tools necessary to fulfill the
duties of employment at an amount not to exceed the direct cost
paid by an employer to an external vendor for those items.
(16) Reimbursement for education or employee skills training.
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110


However, a wage assignment may not be made if the education or
employee skills training benefits were provided, in whole or in
part, through an economic development incentive from any
federal, state, or local program.
(17) An advance for:
(A) payroll; or
(B) vacation;
pay.
(18) The employee's drug education and addiction treatment
services under IC 12-23-23.
(c) The interest rate charged on amounts loaned or advanced to an
employee and repaid under subsection (b) may not exceed the bank
prime loan interest rate as reported by the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System or any successor rate, plus four percent (4%).
(d) The total amount of wages subject to assignment under
subsection (b)(14) and (b)(15) may not exceed the lesser of:
(1) two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year; or
(2) five percent (5%) of the employee's weekly disposable
earnings (as defined in IC 24-4.5-5-105(1)(a)).
(e) Except as provided under 29 CFR Parts 1910, 1915, 1917, 1918,
and 1926, an employee shall not be charged or subject to a wage
assignment under subsection (b)(14) or (b)(15) for protective
equipment including personal protective equipment identified under 29
CFR Parts 1910, 1915, 1917, 1918, and 1926.
2026 IN 1313—LS 6994/DI 110